Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-912
Solar agreement; wind agreement; how
enforced.

A solar agreement or
wind agreement may be enforced
by injunction or proceedings in equity or other civil action.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 8.